North Carolina, session 2025, HB853.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-19 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(l) Special Registration Plate Restriction. – When the Division restores a person's drivers
license which was revoked pursuant to any provision of this Chapter, in addition to any other
restriction or condition, it shall require the person to agree to and shall indicate on the person's
drivers license a restriction that the person may operate only a vehicle that displays a special
registration plate as described in G.S. 20-82.1.
A person subject to this subsection shall obtain a special registration plate for all registered
vehicles owned by that person that the person operates or intends to operate. The person shall not
operate any vehicle that does not have the special registration plate.
Notwithstanding the requirements of this subsection, a person subject to this subsection may
operate a vehicle that is owned by the person's employer and that does not display a special
registration plate only if (i) the person is required to operate that vehicle in the course and scope
of the person's employment, (ii) the employer has been notified that the person is subject to a
license restriction requiring the person to drive only vehicles displaying a special registration
plate, and (iii) the person has proof of the employer's notification in the person's possession while
operating the employer's vehicle for normal business duties. A person shall be subject to this
subsection for the following period:
(1) Seven years if the person is also subject to a restriction in subsection (c3) of
this section.
(2) Three years in all other cases.
A violation of a restriction imposed under this subsection shall result in a one-year revocation.
If the period of revocation was imposed pursuant to subsection (d) or (e) of this section, or
G.S. 20-138.5(d), any remaining period of the original revocation, prior to its reduction, shall be
reinstated and the one-year revocation begins after all other periods of revocation have
terminated."
SECTION 2. Part 5 of Article 3 of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 20-82.1. Special license plate after revocation.
Notwithstanding G.S. 20-63(a), the Division shall issue to any person subject to the
restriction set forth in G.S. 20-19(l), 20-179.3(h1), 20-16.1(b)(1), and 20-20.1(i)(2a), a special
registration plate that is a different color from those regularly issued and that may be readily
*H853-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
identified by law enforcement officers. The Commissioner shall designate the color to be used
on the special registration plate, which shall remain the same from year to year and shall not be
displayed on any other motor vehicles.
No person operating a motor vehicle displaying a special registration plate described in this
section shall knowingly disguise or obscure the color of the special registration plate.
Special registration plates issued pursuant to this section are subject to the regular motor
vehicle registration fee in G.S. 20-87 or G.S. 20-88 plus an additional fee in the amount of ten
dollars ($10.00), which shall be credited by the Division to the Special Registration Plate Account
(SRPA)."
SECTION 3. G.S. 20-179.3 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(h1) Special Registration Plate. – A judge shall include in any limited driving privilege
order issued under this section a special registration plate requirement pursuant to G.S. 20-82.1.
A person subject to this subsection shall obtain a special registration plate for all registered
vehicles owned by that person that the person operates or intends to operate. The person shall not
operate any vehicle that does not have the special registration plate.
Notwithstanding the requirements of this subsection, the person may operate a vehicle that is
owned by the person's employer and that does not display a special registration plate only if (i)
the person is required to operate that vehicle in the course and scope of the person's employment,
(ii) the employer has been notified that the person is subject to a license restriction requiring the
person to drive only vehicles displaying a special registration plate, and (iii) the person has proof
of the employer's notification in the person's possession while operating the employer's vehicle
for normal business duties."
SECTION 4. G.S. 20-16.1(b)(1) reads as rewritten:
"(b) (1) Upon a first conviction only of violating subsection (a), the trial judge may
when feasible allow a limited driving privilege or license to the person
convicted for proper purposes reasonably connected with the health, education
and welfare of the person convicted and his the person's family. For purposes
of determining whether conviction is a first conviction, no prior offense
occurring more than seven years before the date of the current offense shall
be considered. The judge may impose upon such limited driving privilege any
restrictions as in his the judge's discretion are deemed advisable including, but
not limited to, conditions of days, hours, types of vehicles, routes,
geographical boundaries and specific purposes for which limited driving
privilege is allowed. For any limited driving privilege issued pursuant to this
subdivision, the judge must impose a special registration plate requirement
pursuant to G.S. 20-179.3(h1). Any such limited driving privilege allowed and
restrictions imposed thereon shall be specifically recorded in a written
judgment which shall be as near as practical to that hereinafter set forth and
shall be signed by the trial judge and shall be affixed with the seal of the court
and shall be made a part of the records of the said court. A copy of said
judgment shall be transmitted to the Division of Motor Vehicles along with
any driver's license in the possession of the person convicted and a notice of
the conviction. Such permit issued hereunder shall be valid for 30 days from
the date of issuance by trial court. Such permit shall constitute a valid license
to operate motor vehicles of the class or type that would be allowed by the
person's license if it were not currently revoked upon the streets and highways
of this or any other state in accordance with the restrictions noted thereon and
shall be subject to all provisions of law relating to driver's license, not by their
nature, rendered inapplicable."
SECTION 5. G.S. 20-20.1(i) reads as rewritten:
Page 2 House Bill 853-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(i) Restrictions. – A limited driving privilege that is not authorized by this section or that
does not contain the restrictions required by law is invalid. A limited driving privilege issued
under this section is subject to the following conditions:
(1) Financial responsibility. – A person applying for a limited driving privilege
under this section must provide the court proof of financial responsibility
acceptable under G.S. 20-16.1(g) and must maintain the financial
responsibility during the period of the limited driving privilege.
(2) Alcohol restrictions. – A person who received a limited driving privilege
under this section may not consume alcohol while driving or drive at anytime
while the person has remaining in the person's body any alcohol or controlled
substance previously consumed, unless the controlled substance was lawfully
obtained and taken in therapeutically appropriate amounts.
(2a) Special plate. – A judge shall include in any limited driving privilege order
issued under this section a special registration plate requirement pursuant to
G.S. 20-82.1. A person subject to this subsection shall obtain a special
registration plate for all registered vehicles owned by that person that the
person operates or intends to operate. The person shall not operate any vehicle
that does not have the special registration plate. Notwithstanding the
requirements of this subsection, the person may operate a vehicle that is
owned by the person's employer and that does not display a special registration
plate only if (i) the person is required to operate that vehicle in the course and
scope of the person's employment, (ii) the employer has been notified that the
person is subject to a license restriction requiring the person to drive only
vehicles displaying a special registration plate, and (iii) the person has proof
of the employer's notification in the person's possession while operating the
employer's vehicle for normal business duties.
(3) Others. – The court may impose any other reasonable restrictions or
conditions necessary to achieve the purposes of this section."
SECTION 6. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to licenses
revoked and limited driving privileges issued on or after that date.
House Bill 853-First Edition Page 3